Indiana, session 2026, HB1225.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 36-7-32-8.5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.154-2020,
SECTION 50, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8.5. As used in this chapter, "income tax
incremental amount" means the following:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), the remainder of:
(A) the total amount of state adjusted gross income taxes and
local income taxes paid by employees employed in the
territory comprising the certified technology park with respect
to wages and salary earned for work in the territory comprising
the certified technology park for a particular state fiscal year;
minus
(B) the sum of the:
(i) income tax base period amount as defined in section 8 of
this chapter; and
(ii) tax credits awarded by the Indiana economic
development corporation under IC 6-3.1-13 to businesses
operating in a certified technology park as the result of
2026 IN 1225—LS 6310/DI 134


wages earned for work in the certified technology park for
the state fiscal year;
as determined by the department of state revenue.
(2) In the case of a certified technology park for which the amount
limit under section 22(c), or 22(d), or 22(e) of this chapter has
been exceeded, the remainder of:
(A) the total amount of state adjusted gross income taxes and
local income taxes paid by employees employed in the
territory comprising the certified technology park with respect
to wages and salary earned for work in the territory comprising
the certified technology park for a particular state fiscal year;
minus
(B) the sum of the:
(i) income tax base period amount as defined in section 8 of
this chapter; and
(ii) tax credits awarded by the Indiana economic
development corporation under IC 6-3.1-13 to businesses
operating in a certified technology park as the result of
wages earned for work in the certified technology park for
the state fiscal year;
as determined by the department of state revenue.
SECTION 2. IC 36-7-32-22, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2025,
SECTION 18, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. (a) The treasurer of state shall establish an
incremental tax financing fund for each certified technology park
designated under this chapter. The fund shall be administered by the
treasurer of state. Money in the fund does not revert to the state general
fund at the end of a state fiscal year.
(b) Subject to subsection (c), the following amounts shall be
deposited during each state fiscal year in the incremental tax financing
fund established for a certified technology park under subsection (a):
(1) The aggregate amount of state gross retail and use taxes that
are remitted under IC 6-2.5 by businesses operating in the
certified technology park, until the amount of state gross retail
and use taxes deposited equals the gross retail incremental
amount for the certified technology park.
(2) Except as provided in subdivision (3), the aggregate amount
of the following taxes paid by employees employed in the
certified technology park with respect to wages earned for work
in the certified technology park, until the amount deposited equals
the income tax incremental amount as defined in section 8.5(1) of
this chapter:
2026 IN 1225—LS 6310/DI 134


(A) The adjusted gross income tax.
(B) The local income tax (IC 6-3.6).
(3) In the case of a certified technology park to which subsection
(e) applies, the amount determined under subsection (e), if any.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (d), and (e), and (f), not more
than a total of five million dollars ($5,000,000) may be deposited in a
particular incremental tax financing fund for a certified technology
park over the life of the certified technology park.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), subsections (e) and (f), in
the case of a certified technology park that is operating under a written
agreement entered into by two (2) or more redevelopment
commissions, and subject to section 26(b)(4) of this chapter:
(1) not more than a total of five million dollars ($5,000,000) may
be deposited over the life of the certified technology park in the
incremental tax financing fund of each redevelopment
commission participating in the operation of the certified
technology park; and
(2) the total amount that may be deposited in all incremental tax
financing funds, over the life of the certified technology park, in
aggregate, may not exceed the result of:
(A) five million dollars ($5,000,000); multiplied by
(B) the number of redevelopment commissions that have
entered into a written agreement for the operation of the
certified technology park.
(e) If a certified technology park has reached the limit on deposits
under subsection (c) or (d) and maintains its certification under section
11(c) of this chapter, the certified technology park shall become a
Level 2 certified technology park and an additional annual deposit
amount shall be deposited in the incremental tax financing fund for the
certified technology park equal to the following:
(1) For a certified technology park to which subsection (c)
applies, the lesser of:
(A) the income tax incremental amount as defined in section
8.5(2) of this chapter; or
(B) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000).
(2) For a certified technology park to which subsection (d)
applies, the lesser of:
(A) the aggregate income tax incremental amounts as defined
in section 8.5(2) of this chapter attributable to each
redevelopment commission that has entered into a written
agreement for the operation of the certified technology park;
or
2026 IN 1225—LS 6310/DI 134


(B) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) multiplied
by the number of redevelopment commissions that have
entered into a written agreement for the operation of the
certified technology park.
(3) The following apply to deposits under this subsection:
(A) If a certified technology park reached its limit on deposits
based on a state fiscal year ending before July 1, 2020, the
certified technology park shall receive deposits based on the
income tax incremental amount as defined in section 8.5(2) of
this chapter for each state fiscal year ending after June 30,
2019.
(B) If a certified technology park reached its limit on deposits
based on a state fiscal year ending after June 30, 2020, the
certified technology park shall receive deposits based on the
income tax incremental amount as defined in section 8.5(2) of
this chapter for the state fiscal year in which it reached its limit
on deposits under subsection (c) or (d) and each state fiscal
year thereafter.
(C) If a certified technology park is permitted to receive
deposits under this subsection during the state fiscal year in
which it reached its limit on deposits under subsection (c) or
(d), the income tax incremental amount for purposes of
subdivision (1)(A) or (1)(B) for that state fiscal year shall be
reduced by an amount equal to:
(i) the deposit amount for the state fiscal year under
subsection (b) required to reach the limit on deposits under
subsection (c) or (d); minus
(ii) the gross retail incremental amount determined under
section 6.5 of this chapter;
but not less than zero (0).
(f) This subsection applies to a certified technology park that is
located within a qualified military base enhancement area under
IC 36-7-34. If a certified technology park has reached the limit on
deposits under subsection (e) and maintains its certification under
section 11(c) of this chapter, the certified technology park shall
become a Level 3 certified technology park and an additional
annual deposit amount shall be deposited in the incremental tax
financing fund for the certified technology park equal to the lesser
of:
(1) the aggregate income tax incremental amounts as defined
in section 8.5(2) of this chapter attributable to each
redevelopment commission that has entered into a written
2026 IN 1225—LS 6310/DI 134


agreement for the operation of the certified technology park;
or
(2) two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) multiplied
by the number of redevelopment commissions that have
entered into a written agreement for the operation of the
certified technology park.
(f) (g) This subsection applies to a Level 2 or Level 3 certified
technology park designated in subsection (e) or (f). When the office
recertifies a certified technology park as required under section 11 of
this chapter, the office shall make a determination of whether the
certified technology park shall continue to be designated as a Level 2
or Level 3 certified technology park.
(g) (h) On or before the twentieth day of each month, all amounts
held in the incremental tax financing fund established for a certified
technology park shall be distributed to the redevelopment commission
for deposit in the certified technology park fund established under
section 23 of this chapter.
2026 IN 1225—LS 6310/DI 134